Hawaii statutes.
[§256-2] College savings program
established. There is established the college savings program. The
purpose of this program is to enable families to save for college tuition and
other expenses through college accounts. The program shall provide college
accounts to:

(1) Enable residents of this State and other states
to benefit from the tax incentive provided for qualified state tuition programs
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and

(2) Attract students to public and private colleges
and universities within the State. [L 1999, c 81, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next